Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB65.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.178 is repealed and reenacted to read as follows:
(1) It shall be the duty of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, provided sufficient
funds are available as provided in subsection (3) of this section, to ensure that a
durable, permanent copy of the Ten Commandments shall be displayed on a wall in
each public elementary and secondary school classroom in the Commonwealth. The
copy shall be sixteen (16) inches wide by twenty (20) inches high.
(2) In small print below the last commandment shall appear a notation concerning the
purpose of the display, as follows: "The secular application of the Ten
Commandments is clearly seen in its adoption as the fundamental legal code of
Western Civilization and the Common Law of the United States."
(3) The copies required by this section shall be purchased with funds made available
through voluntary contributions made to the State Treasurer for the purposes of this
section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/4/2025 10:14 AM Jacketed